Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2079.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVI-C.1BUDGET IMPASSE REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAMSection 1601-C.1. Scope of article.This article establishes the Budget Impasse Reimbursement Program.Section 1602-C.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Budget impasse." The period between July 1, 2025, and the effective date of the General Appropriation Act for the 2025-2026 fiscal year."Eligible entity." A school district, county, human services provider, Pre-K provider, Head Start provider, nonprofit organization or any entity that receives funding from the Commonwealth, either directly or through a Commonwealth agency, in accordance with the General Appropriation Act and received funding in the 2024-2025 fiscal year. The term does not include an entity that received funding from discretionary agency programs or competitive agency programs in the 2024-2025 fiscal year."Fund." The Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund established under section 1701-A."Impasse-generated interest." Interest income accrued in the 20250HB2079PN2667 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 Commonwealth's General Fund and the fund as a result of delayed expenditures or transfers during a budget impasse."Office." The Office of the Budget of the Commonwealth."Program." The Budget Impasse Reimbursement Program established under section 1603-C.1.Section 1603-C.1. Establishment of program.(a) Establishment.--The Budget Impasse Reimbursement Program is established within the office.(b) Administration.--The office shall administer the program to reimburse eligible entities for documented financing costs or interest income lost by an eligible entity directly attributable to a budget impasse.(c) Application.--The office shall develop and make available an application for an eligible entity to apply for the program.(d) Eligibility.--The office shall develop guidelines for eligibility in accordance with this article.(e) Review.--The office shall review an application and, if eligible, award funds to an eligible entity.(f) Guidelines.--The office shall develop and publish guidelines to implement this article.Section 1604-C.1. Funding source.The program shall be funded from impasse-generated interest. If impasse-generated interest is insufficient to meet eligible reimbursement obligations, the General Assembly shall appropriate necessary funds from interest earnings of the fund.Section 1605-C.1. Reporting.The office shall submit an annual report to the Governor, the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of 20250HB2079PN2667 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Representatives detailing all of the following:(1) The total amount of impasse-generated interest identified and utilized.(2) The total amount appropriated and disbursed under this article.(3) The number and types of entities reimbursed.(4) The methodology used to calculate eligible reimbursements.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB2079PN2667 - 4 - 123456789